Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.210

Public work or improvement—Procedures—Purchases.

Procedures for any public work or improvement for code cities shall be governed by RCW 35.23.352.

Purchases for code cities with twenty thousand population or more shall be governed by RCW 35.22.620. Purchases for code cities with under twenty thousand population shall be governed by RCW 35.23.352.

[ 2009 c 229 s 5; 1989 c 11 s 8; 1979 ex.s. c 89 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.